Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1408
Attorney General; enforcement authority.

(1) The Attorney General may bring an action in the district court of Lancaster County against any controller or processor that violates the Agricultural Data Privacy Act to:

(a) Seek injunctive relief; or

(b) Recover a civil penalty in the amount of one thousand dollars for each separate violation. Any such civil penalty that is recovered shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(2) The Agricultural Data Privacy Act shall not be construed to create any new private cause of action. The enforcement authority granted to the Attorney General under this section shall be the exclusive remedy for violations of the Agricultural Data Privacy Act.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 8.
July 18, 2026